Illinois, session 104th, HB544.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Unemployment Insurance Trust Fund 5Financing Act is amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 440/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Illinois Unemployment Insurance Trust Fund Financing Act.9(Source: P.A. 93-634, eff. 1-1-04.)